District of Columbia statutes.
3-701

Statement of purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to support programs directed toward evaluating and improving the status of women in the District of Columbia by establishing the Commission for Women.

History

Sept. 22, 1978, D.C. Law 2-109, § 2, 25 DCR 1456

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-801.
1973 Ed., § 2-2601.

Editor's Notes

Establishment and Appointments—Mayor’s Commission on Violence Against Women, see Mayor’s Order 2001-179, December 7, 2001 ( 48 DCR 11597).